Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 4 Commercial Fisheries

20-4-1.
Commercial fishing.

No person shall engage in the taking for sale, by any manner, method, or contrivance, of any marine finfish, shellfish, crustacean, or other invertebrate; and no vessel, boat, trap, seine, or other fishing gear shall be used in the taking for sale or landing of any marine finfish, shellfish, crustacean, or other invertebrate unless a license or permit has been obtained as provided in this title. Provided, however, that for all commercial fisheries except shellfish, any number of unlicensed crews may assist in direct commercial harvest operations regardless of the manner, method, or contrivance employed, as long as said crew is/are located onboard a commercially declared vessel that is operated by an individual who possesses a valid and proper commercial fishing license and is/are under the direct supervision and responsibility of said properly licensed commercial fisher. With respect to commercial shellfish operations, unlicensed crews may only assist with culling activities and other indirect harvest operations, as the director may determine by regulations adopted pursuant to this title, while said crew is/are located onboard a commercially declared vessel that is operated by an individual who possesses a valid and proper commercial fishing license and is/are under the direct supervision and responsibility of said properly licensed commercial fisher.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 320, § 1.

20-4-1.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art 17, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

20-4-1.2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 288, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 7; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

20-4-1.3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 8; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

20-4-2.
Otter trawls, pair trawls, and beam trawls — Areas prohibited.

Unless otherwise specified in regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council and except for those areas described in §

20-4-3

, no person shall operate a beam, pair, or otter trawl or other mechanical trawling device in the Sakonnet River; Narragansett Bay; in Point Judith Pond, so-called, in the towns of Narragansett and South Kingstown; or the Harbor of Refuge, so-called, in the town of Narragansett; or in Potter Pond, so-called, in the town of South Kingstown; or in Great Salt Pond, so-called, in the town of New Shoreham.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-3.
Otter trawls, pair trawls, and beam trawls — Areas allowed.

Any duly licensed resident commercial fisherman and a nonresident commercial fisherman licensed pursuant to §

20-2-28

[repealed], may operate otter, beam, or pair trawls or other mechanical trawling device subject to rules and regulations of the marine fisheries council, in the area of Narragansett Bay, and Sakonnet River south of a line, extending from Spink Neck in the town of North Kingstown in a northeasterly direction to Pine Hill Point on Prudence Island and from a point at Homestead Dock on the easterly shore of Prudence Island, thence northeasterly to Hog Island shoal light, thence to the north abutment of Mt. Hope Bridge in the town of Bristol, and south of a line extending from McCurry Point on the east side of the town of Portsmouth northeasterly in a line to southerly point of Jack’s Island, so-called, in the town of Tiverton. The area subject to this section may be changed by rules and regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-4.
Otter trawls, pair trawls, and beam trawls — Penalties.

Any person who operates an otter, beam, or pair trawl or other mechanical trawling device without a license as provided in §

20-4-3

, shall, upon conviction, be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, or may be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both. In addition to any fines imposed for failure to secure a license, the person shall be subject to the same penalties as set forth in §

20-1-16

should the person set a beam, pair, or otter trawl or other mechanical trawling device in areas prohibited by §

20-4-2

or rules adopted under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-5.
Report of commercial fisheries.

The owner and/or operator of every boat and/or operator of any device licensed pursuant to this title for the taking or landing of marine organisms for commercial purposes in the state of Rhode Island, or any person issued a license by the director for such purposes, and any dealer of marine organisms licensed pursuant to this title shall, upon request of the department, make either a telephone report, or a written report, or both. Written reports shall be made on forms furnished by the department of environmental management and shall include catch and effort data and any other fishery data that may be required by the director. The reports shall not be made public and shall be kept only for statistical purposes. Failure to comply with the reporting requirements set out in this section or knowingly or willfully making a false report is prohibited. The license or permit of any person found in violation of this section or regulation duly promulgated thereto may be suspended for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days for each offense. No application for a license renewal shall be accepted from a person whose license or permit is currently under suspension or whose reports have not been submitted. Catch reports must be submitted at a time and in a format specified by the director; provided, however, that any such reporting requirements shall not be unreasonable and shall not create an undue burden.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 469, § 1.

20-4-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 469, § 2, effective July 8, 1999. For present similar provisions, see §

20-4-5

.

20-4-7.
Marking of traps.

The owner of every trap, pot, or other stationary contrivance used for the taking of marine fish, shellfish, crustaceans, or other invertebrates being fished in the waters of this state, and the owner of any trap or pot for catching, or cars or other contrivances for keeping lobsters, shall mark each trap, pot, or contrivance, together with the buoy that is attached to it, with the name or names of the owners of the contrivance or the person or persons using the contrivance, and the license number or numbers of each person or persons. Every person failing to mark each trap as provided in this section shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), for each offense and all traps, pots, or other contrivances used contrary to the provisions of this and other sections of this chapter shall be seized by any officer engaged in the enforcement of this chapter; and the property shall be forfeited to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-8.
Unauthorized raising of traps, pots, and devices.

No person except the director, enforcement officers, and authorized technical personnel of the department shall unduly disturb, lift, raise, molest, or remove any animal from a trap, pot, or any other device of a person licensed under this title without the written permission of that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 204, § 1.

20-4-9.
Striped bass — Minimum size.

Unless otherwise specified in regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council, no person shall take in any manner whatsoever from the territorial waters of this state, including the waters of the Atlantic Ocean, or have in his or her possession, any striped bass measuring less than sixteen inches (16") in length. Striped bass shall be measured from the tip of the snout to the fork of the tail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-10.
Possession or sale of undersize bass — Interstate commerce.

No person, firm, or corporation shall take, possess, sell, possess for sale, or offer for sale any striped bass measuring less than sixteen inches (16") in length, whether caught within the jurisdictional limits of this state or otherwise; provided, however, that this chapter shall not apply to striped bass packed and in transportation in unbroken packages and coming from any other state or country and destined for some point outside the state of Rhode Island; provided, that the packages shall be clearly marked by stencil, tag, or otherwise, showing the true origin of the shipment and its destination beyond the limits of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 357, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 369, § 2, effective July 13, 2011.

20-4-12.
Striped bass — Use of nets and seines prohibited — Traps.

Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, no person, firm, or corporation shall take, or attempt to take, with or by the use of a net, seine, or any other contrivance of any kind or description except by hook and line, spear, or by fish traps authorized under authority of chapter 5 of this title, as amended, any striped bass from the public waters of this state northerly of a line commencing at upper pier in the town of Narragansett and extending in a straight line in a northeasterly direction to Beavertail Lighthouse and thence continuing in a northeasterly direction in a straight line to Castle Hill Lighthouse in the city of Newport; nor shall any person, firm, or corporation take, or attempt to take, with or by the use of a seine, any striped bass from the beach in the town of Charlestown for a distance of three (3) miles to the east of Charlestown Inlet; provided, however, that it shall not be a violation of this section for any person to take striped bass by means of the seine, net, or other contrivance while fishing for other fish for the catching of which the use of the seine, net, or other contrivance is permitted if the striped bass is immediately returned to the waters from which taken; provided further, however, at all fish traps, between September first and October fourteenth in any year, there is no obstruction, except the trap anchor warp of the leader within one hundred fifty feet (150´) from the mean high water mark on shore that will stop the free passage of striped bass. For the purpose of this chapter, a “trap anchor warp” is any cable, wire, line, or like material or device, and shall not exceed three inches (3") in diameter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-4-13.
Commercial gill net fishery — License or permit required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to set, haul, and/or maintain a commercial gill net in the public waters of the state without first obtaining a license or permit as provided in § 20-2.1-5(2)(ii)(C). Any person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 305, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 26.

20-4-14.
Direct sales.

The director of the department of environmental management pursuant to the authority and provisions of this title shall issue and enforce rules, regulations, and orders with respect to the following matters and activities:

Authorizing the transportation and sale of allowable species of live lobsters, live crabs, and live whelk by the holder of a license issued pursuant to subsection (a)(2), or by the authorized agent/crewmember of the license holder, from the vessel or dockside from the vessel on which the seafood was harvested to a consumer or licensed seafood retailer; and

Issuance of a direct sale dealer license to applicants possessing a resident commercial fishing license or resident landing permit, and who provide documentation to the satisfaction of the director that the applicant has permission or authority from both the property owner and the municipality of the location where the sales subject to the provisions of subsection (a)(1) shall be conducted.

Rules, regulations, and orders promulgated by the director pursuant to subsection (a) shall include the following provisions:

Only the licensee, or a regularly employed crewmember of the licensee, may sell allowable species under the direct sale dealer license. To be eligible to conduct such sales, a crewmember must first receive written authorization from the licensee. Such authorization shall be in the form of a typewritten statement, signed and dated by the licensee, that expressly authorizes the crewmember to act on behalf of the licensee with regard to direct sales. The statement shall further specify: the name of the crewmember; the name of the vessel from which the sales are conducted; and the month and year that the crewmember began working on the vessel. The statement shall be kept on the vessel and be available at all times for inspection by department personnel. A crewmember who is acting on behalf of a licensee must comply with all applicable regulations governing direct sales, as set forth in this subsection, and the licensee shall be responsible for any violations of regulations by the crewmember;

All direct sale activities must be conducted in a manner consistent with applicable federal, state, and municipal laws, regulations, and polices governing port and marina operations;

Lobsters, crabs, and whelk must be sold live;

Finfish may be headed, gutted, and bled dockside from the vessel. No other processing may be done dockside from the vessel;

Transporting is limited to lobsters, crabs, and whelk harvested from individual vessels and sold and transported by the individual harvester or affiliated crewmembers. The name of the vessel and license holder, provided in writing and legible, must accompany all transported lobsters, crabs, and whelk; and

All seafood must be stored and handled in a safe and sanitary manner pursuant to department regulations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit:

The direct sale of histamine producing fish, including bluefish, tuna, mackerel, herring, mahi mahi, bonito, swordfish, marlin, sailfish, wahoo, anchovy, sardines, shad, menhaden as well as amberjack, escolar, hind, jack, kahawai, milkfish, saury, scad, spearfish, sprat and trevally, and striped bass; or

The transportation for sale of finfish to consumers and/or retailers. All sales of finfish must be sold dockside from the vessel.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 6, 2021.